Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.465

Financial education public-private partnership account.

The Washington financial education public-private partnership account is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the financial education public-private partnership, and to provide financial education opportunities for students and financial education professional development opportunities for the teachers providing those educational opportunities. Revenues to the account may include gifts from the private sector, federal funds, and any appropriations made by the legislature or other sources. Grants and their administration shall be paid from the account. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account, and only at the direction of the partnership. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2009 c 443 s 5; 2004 c 247 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2004 c 247: See note following RCW 28A.300.450.